California statutes. Education Code
(a) (1) The trustees may enter into agreements with any public or private agency, officer, person, or institution, corporation, association, or foundation for the performance of acts or for the furnishing of services, facilities, materials, goods, supplies, or equipment by or for the trustees or for the joint performance of an act or function or the joint furnishing of services and facilities by the trustees and the other party to the agreement.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall prescribe policies and procedures for the acquisition of services, facilities, materials, goods, supplies, or equipment. The policies and procedures of the trustees for the acquisition of materials, goods, supplies, or equipment shall include competitive means for obtaining best value while complying with legislative intent regarding competitive bids or proposals as it is expressed in Article 3 (commencing with Section 10300) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and may include the use of financing arrangements.

(3) The trustees may enter into agreements with the federal government or any agency thereof in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the federal government or agency in order to receive the benefits of any federal statute extending benefits to the California State University or to California State University students, including, but not necessarily limited to, both of the following:

(A) Agreements with any agency of the federal government for the education of persons in the service of the federal government.

(B) Agreements with any agency of the federal government for the education of veterans. These agreements shall provide for payment of the maximum amount permitted under the act, or acts, of Congress under which the agreement is entered into.

(4) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees have all power necessary to perform any acts, and comply with conditions, required or imposed by the federal government in order to receive the benefits. The trustees are vested with all necessary power and authority to cooperate with any agency of the federal government in the administration of any applicable act of Congress and rules and regulations adopted thereunder.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees have all power necessary to award contracts to one or more contractors, at any one or more campuses, for the collection of delinquent education loans required to be repaid under federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 219, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

89037.

The trustees may establish facilities for training deaf persons at the campus of the California State University which the trustees shall designate for such purpose. The trustees shall do all of the following:

(a) Request the Department of Rehabilitation to refer deaf students to the designated state university.

(b) Recognize the designated campus of the California State University as a professional center for training deaf persons and take all action necessary to facilitate the receipt by the campus of state and federal funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 98.)
-------------------------------------------

89038.

The trustees may enter into agreements with any agency of the federal government for the construction of housing and other educational facilities for students and faculties of any campus of the California State University under the jurisdiction of the trustees if they determine that the income, rent, and charges for the use of the facilities will be sufficient in amount to repay the principal and interest on the amount secured from the federal government for the construction of the facilities.

The trustees may also enter into agreements with any agency of the federal government which result in grants, matching funds, or any other kind of financial aid for construction of housing and other educational facilities for students and staff of any campus of the California State University under the jurisdiction of the trustees.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, whenever necessary to secure the full benefits of any federal statutes pertaining to loans, grants, matching funds, or any other kind of financial aid to educational institutions for housing and other educational facilities, the trustees may give such security as may be required and may comply with such conditions as may be imposed by the federal government.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 99.)
-------------------------------------------

89039.

(a) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in Article 2 (commencing with Section 1940) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code, the trustees may enter into an agreement with any political entity mentioned in Section 87422 for the exchange and employment of persons serving as teachers in state college laboratory demonstration elementary schools and employees of public schools of the political entity. The exchange and employment shall be made under comparable circumstances, subject to comparable conditions, with comparable effect as to tenure and retirement rights, subject to comparable requirements as to payment of salary and deductions therefrom, and for the same period of time as set forth in Sections 87422, 87423, and 87424 with respect to the exchange of school district employees, except that the circumstances, conditions, rights, and requirements shall be those appropriate to the employment relationship between the teachers and the trustees.

(b) If the provisions of this section are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 3560) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if such provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1072.)
-------------------------------------------

89041.

The trustees may give in the name of the State of California such bond as may be required by the federal government, or any officer or agency thereof, for the care, safekeeping, and return of property of the United States issued to the California State University for the Reserve Officer Training Corps unit maintained at the campus.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 101.)
-------------------------------------------

89042.

The trustees may issue subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses before the trustees, or any member thereof, in the same manner as any court in this state. Whenever the testimony of any witness upon any matter pending before them is material, the trustees shall cause the attendance of the witnesses before the trustees, or a member of the trustees, to testify concerning the matter, and the trustees may make a reasonable allowance for this purpose not exceeding the fees of witnesses in civil cases. The allowance shall be paid for out of the appropriation for the expenses of the trustees, but in no instance shall an allowance be made in favor of a witness who appears in behalf of a claimant. The provisions of this section shall not apply to proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89043.

The trustees shall have the powers conferred upon heads of departments of the state by Article 2 (commencing with Section 11180), Chapter 2, Part 1, Division 3, Title 2 of the Government Code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89044.

The trustees may budget an amount to be expended for use in carrying out the community relation responsibilities of the president of each campus of the California State University and of the chancellor, as defined by the trustees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 398, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

89045.

(a) The trustees shall establish an internal audit staff, which shall include the staff positions authorized for internal auditing. The internal auditing staff shall report directly to the trustees, and shall be available for consultation with any audit committee of the trustees which may be established by the trustees.

(b) The duties of the internal audit staff shall include, but shall not necessarily be limited to, auditing, reviewing, cost and systems analysis, analyzing, and recommending operating procedures for the California State University.

(c) Management audits shall be made to determine the effectiveness and efficiency of the organization, operation, and procedures of each state university, each auxiliary organization, and the office of the chancellor. Officials and employees of each state university, each auxiliary organization, and the office of the chancellor shall furnish all books, papers, contracts, management charts, and related information necessary for management audits.

(d) In addition, the internal audit staff shall perform audits, at least once every five years, of the activities of the California State University pursuant to Sections 89031.5, 89036, 89046, and 89048 and Section 11007.7 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 219, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

89046.

(a) The trustees may lease any property of a state university for any purpose that they consider is not inconsistent with the functions of the California State University including, but not limited to:

(1) The lease of state university property to a nonprofit organization composed exclusively of students of the university or of members of the
 faculty of the university, or both, for purposes related to the activities of the university or for the activities of student or faculty organizations.

(2) The lease of state university property to any nonprofit organization for the purpose of constructing and using thereon buildings as living quarters for students of the university and as
 meeting places.

(3) The lease to any student or faculty organization of the university of property for the purpose of establishing and maintaining cooperative stores, and cafeterias in connection with those stores.

(b) Any rental income received by the trustees under this or other leasing sections shall be deposited
 into the California State University Trust Fund established pursuant to Section 89722.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 40.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

89047.

(a) The trustees and the governing board of any school district within which a campus of the California State University is located may enter into an agreement providing for the leasing by the state of a school building of the school district for use by the campus as a laboratory demonstration elementary school on terms and conditions that may be agreed upon by the trustees and the governing board of the school district except as otherwise provided in this section.

(b) The lease may be for a period not to exceed 20 years and, in addition to any other terms and conditions set forth therein, shall do all of the following:

(1) Require the school district to maintain the building at its own expense.

(2) Require the campus to maintain a school therein open to pupils of the school district residing in the attendance district for the school as established by the governing board of the district.

(3) Require the school district to pay annually to the state on or before the end of each fiscal year an amount determined by computing the current expenditures per pupil in the elementary schools of the district for the fiscal year and multiplying the amount so computed by the average daily attendance for the fiscal year in the school in excess of 400.

(c) Only the average daily attendance in the school in excess of 400 shall be credited to the school district.

(d) The average daily attendance of pupils in the school shall be computed separately in the same manner as the average daily attendance in other schools of the same grade maintained by the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 758, Sec. 254.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

89048.

Notwithstanding Article 1 (commencing with Section 11000) of Chapter 1 of Part 1, Article 2 (commencing with Section 14660) of Chapter 2 of Part 5.5, and Part 11 (commencing with Section 15850), of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, or any other provision of law, the trustees may perform the following functions, without prior approval of any other state department or agency, when necessary to carry out the purposes of the California State University:

(a) Acquire easements or rights-of-way necessary for the proper utilization of real property of the California State University.

(b) Grant and convey in the name of the California State University easements and rights-of-way across property belonging to the California State University subject to the conditions, limitations, restrictions, and reservations the trustees determine are in the best interests of the California State University.

(c) Quitclaim the right, title, and interest of the California State University in and to easements and rights-of-way owned by the California State University which the trustees determine are no longer needed for California State University purposes.

(d) Sell, lease, or exchange any personal property belonging to the California State University, if the trustees determine that the sale, lease, or exchange is in the best interests of the California State University. Transactions under this subdivision shall be for consideration based on fair market values.

(e) Lease any real or personal property for the use of the California State University.

(f) Sell, exchange, or otherwise dispose of real property acquired from revenues generated by the parking and housing programs in the California State University, to a recognized auxiliary organization of the California State University, as authorized by Section 89901. The sale, exchange, or other disposition shall be consistent with the requirements of any indenture or other agreement to which the trustees are a party. Transactions under this subdivision shall be for consideration based on the fair market value of the property to be sold, exchanged, or otherwise disposed of, and shall be subject to the following conditions:

(1) Where more than one auxiliary organization of the California State University expresses interest in acquiring the property, the sale, exchange, or other form of disposal shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. The net present value of the projected proceeds of a bid shall be used to determine the highest responsible bidder, where applicable.

(2) When the real property for sale is an improvement situated on land purchased with funds not generated by the parking or housing programs of the California State University, rights to the land upon which the improvement is situated, and access thereto, shall be leased and not sold or exchanged to the acquiring party.

(3) When the real property for sale includes land purchased with funds generated by the parking or housing programs of the California State University, the property shall have at least one border with property that is not owned by the California State University. 

(g) Acquire, when it is in the best interests of the state, real property with revenues generated by the parking and housing programs of the California State University.

(1) Any acquisition of real property carried out pursuant to this subdivision shall be reported annually to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the Department of Finance by January 5 of each year.

(2) Any acquisition carried out pursuant to this subdivision shall include relocation assistance, when appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 219, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

89048.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the trustees shall include in the contract of conveyance of any real property sold by the California State University a statement that if it is subsequently determined that the property subject to conveyance contains a Native American burial ground, that fact shall be reported to the Legislature and the property may revert to the state if a statute is enacted requiring that reversion.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1097, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

89049.1.

Notwithstanding Article 1.5 (commencing with Section 16360) of Chapter 2 of Part 2 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code, money received by the state from the United States for distribution by the trustees for student financial aid purposes shall not be remitted to the Federal Trust Fund, but shall only be reported to the Director of Finance for accounting purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 414, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. California Mathematics Diagnostic Testing Program [89070.10. - 89070.40.]

89070.10.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this chapter to establish a program which will identify skills and knowledge necessary for success at various levels of college preparatory mathematics and to ensure that each public school pupil who can benefit from this program shall have access thereto. The program shall provide timely diagnostic assessments to both teachers and pupils indicating in which areas of mathematics pupils and classes are adequately prepared and in which areas further study is necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.15.

The California Mathematics Diagnostic Testing Program is hereby established. The Trustees of the California State University shall administer the program and in so doing shall cooperate with the University of California, the California Community Colleges, and the State Department of Education.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.20.

The trustees shall do all of the following:

(a) Develop assessment materials and diagnostic services which are designed to assess pupils’ knowledge and skills in the area of mathematics and which are consistent with the Mathematics Framework for California Public Schools and the expectations of postsecondary education.

(b) Make these materials and services available to mathematics faculty members of the public school system, who request them.

(c) Provide opportunities for mathematics faculty of high schools operated by school districts throughout California, especially those at junior and senior high schools which have low student participation or achievement in postsecondary education, to work with postsecondary faculty to consider their pupils’ diagnostic results.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.25.

In developing this system, the trustees shall ensure that the use of these assessment instruments and diagnostic services assist in all of the following:

(a) Contributing to secondary school pupils’ preparation for postsecondary education.

(b) Reducing the demand for remedial programs in mathematics at the postsecondary level.

(c) Complementing and supplementing other assessment efforts, including, but not limited to, the California Assessment Program, and the Golden State Examination, by making available to pupils, parents, faculty, and the advisory committee careful analyses of pupils’ readiness for work in college preparatory mathematics.

(d) Providing individual pupils with detailed information about their levels of preparedness in areas of mathematics needed for success in further college-preparatory or beginning level college mathematics.

(e) Helping teachers and departments examine the effectiveness of existing courses in preparing pupils for further mathematics study.

(f) Encouraging appropriate use of these instruments in schools with low student participation in postsecondary education.

(g) Ensuring that public schools located in all areas of the state, including rural, urban, and suburban have access to program services.

(h) Establishing networks between secondary and postsecondary mathematics faculty to address curricular issues, including but not limited to, mathematics prerequisites for success in college.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.30.

An intersegmental advisory committee is hereby established to make recommendations to the trustees regarding the policies, organization, and operations of the California Mathematics Diagnostic Testing Program, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) Developing a general policy for the diagnostic assessment of secondary pupils which is directly related to the skills and knowledge needed for success in college level mathematics and which is consistent with the Mathematics Framework for California Public Schools and the expectations of postsecondary education.

(b) Developing criteria for determining program direction.

(c) Developing criteria for program evaluation which shall include, but shall not be limited to, determining whether there is an increase in the number of students taking advanced college preparatory mathematics courses, and determining whether there is an improvement in California Assessment Program, Golden State Examination, and other assessment scores.

(d) Developing criteria for ensuring that all public schools throughout the state have access to program services, and ensuring, as a primary objective, participation by those schools with low student enrollment in postsecondary education.

(e) Identifying additional resources and efforts which promote the objectives of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.35.

(a) The intersegmental advisory committee shall consist of the following members:

(1) Two members, one of whom shall be a mathematics faculty member, appointed by each of the following:

(A) The Chancellor of the California State University.

(B) The President of the University of California, if he or she chooses to serve as a member.

(C) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges.

(D) The Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) One member appointed by each of the following:

(A) The Chair of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities.

(B) The Director of the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(C) The Chair of the California Academic Partnership Program Advisory Committee.

(D) The Director of the California Mathematics Project.

(b) The intersegmental advisory committee may recommend that the trustees increase its size by the appointment of public, corporate, or other members.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

89070.40.

The Trustees of the California State University shall work with the University of California, the California Postsecondary Education Commission, and the advisory committee to develop a comprehensive program evaluation. This evaluation shall be conducted in 1993, and every three years thereafter to determine the success of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 872, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Academic Year Operations [89080. - 89084.]

89080.

It is the intent of the Legislature, while maintaining the maximum utilization of funds provided for the support of public higher education, to provide increased access to higher education for all residents of this state, to permit maximum use of existing facilities and academic resources of the California State University campuses, to provide for the orderly growth and expansion of the state’s system of higher education, and to allow for effective long-range planning to meet the needs of the institutions of higher education while maintaining the quality of that education.

Thus, it is the intent of the Legislature to establish year-round operations at the California State University where practical.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 110.)
-------------------------------------------

89084.

Any campus of the California State University which operated on a year-round basis on November 23, 1970, shall continue to operate on that basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 112.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Alumni [89090. - 89090.]

89090.

(a) The trustees, alumni associations, and auxiliary organizations may distribute the names, addresses, and email addresses of alumni of the California State University to a business as described in subdivision (b), in order to accomplish any or all of the following:

(1) To provide those persons with informational materials relating to the university and its programs and activities.

(2) To provide those persons, the trustees, the alumni associations, and the auxiliary organizations with commercial opportunities that provide a benefit to those persons, or to the trustees, alumni associations, or auxiliary organizations.

(3) To promote and
 support the educational mission of the university, the trustees, the alumni associations, or the auxiliary organizations.

(b) The disclosures authorized in subdivision (a) shall be permitted only if all of the following requirements are met:

(1) (A) The trustees, the alumni associations, or the auxiliary organizations have a written agreement with a business, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1798.80 of the Civil Code, that maintains control over this data that requires the business to maintain the confidentiality of the names, addresses, and email addresses of the alumni, that requires that the California State University retain the right to approve or reject any purpose for which the private information is to be used by the business, and to review and approve the text of mailings sent to alumni pursuant to this section, and that prohibits the
 business from using the information for purposes other than those described in subdivision (a). The text of a mailing intended to be sent to alumni pursuant to this section shall not be approved by the trustees, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization unless and until the mailing conspicuously identifies the university, the alumni association, or the auxiliary organization as associated with the business described in the mailing.

(B) If an affinity partner, as defined in Section 4054.6 of the Financial Code, sends any message to an email address obtained pursuant to this section, that message shall include at least both of the following:

(i) The identity of the sender of the message.

(ii) A
 cost-free means for the recipient to notify the sender not to electronically transmit any further message to the recipient.

(2) The trustees, an alumni association, or an auxiliary organization shall not disclose to, or share alumni nonpublic personal information with, a business, as defined in paragraph (1), unless the institution, association, or organization has clearly and conspicuously notified the alumnus, pursuant to subdivision (c), that the nonpublic personal information may be disclosed to the business and that the alumnus has not directed that the nonpublic personal information not be disclosed.

(3) The disclosure of alumni names, addresses, and email addresses does not include the names, addresses, and email addresses of alumni who, pursuant to subdivision (c) or in another manner, have directed the trustees, an alumni association, or an auxiliary organization not to
 disclose their names, addresses, or email addresses.

(4) Information regarding either of the following is not disclosed:

(A) The current students of the California State University.

(B) An alumnus who, as a student at a campus of the California State University, indicated that, pursuant to the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (Public Law 93-380), he or she did not wish his or her name, address, and email address to be disclosed.

(c) (1) The trustees, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization shall satisfy the notice requirements of subdivision (b) if it uses the form set forth in paragraph (2). The form set forth in this subdivision or a form that complies with subparagraphs (A) to
 (J), inclusive, shall be provided by the trustees, the alumni association, or the auxiliary organization to the alumnus as required in this subdivision, and shall describe the nature of the information the alumnus would receive should the alumnus choose not to opt out, so that the alumnus may make a decision and provide direction to the trustees, the alumni association, or the auxiliary organization regarding the sharing of his or her name, address, and email address:

(A) The form uses the title “IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE” and the header, if applicable, as follows: “Restrict Information Sharing With Affinity Partners.”

(B) The titles and headers in the form are clearly and conspicuously displayed, and no text in the form is smaller than 10-point type.

(C) The form may be provided as a separate document, incorporated
 into another communication piece intended for the target audience, or provided through a link to the form located on the Internet Web site of the trustees, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization. If the form is provided through a link to an Internet Web page, it shall be accompanied by the title “IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE” and a clear and concise description of the choice that can be made by accessing the form. This requirement may be met by using text materially similar to the first paragraph of the form set forth in paragraph (2).

(D) The choice or choices provided in the form are stated separately, and may be selected by checking a box.

(E) The form is designed to call attention to the nature and significance of the information in the document.

(F) The form presents information in
 clear and concise sentences, paragraphs, and sections.

(G) The form uses short explanatory sentences of an average of 15 to 20 words, or bullet lists whenever possible.

(H) The form avoids multiple negatives, legal terminology, and highly technical terminology whenever possible.

(I) The form avoids explanations that are imprecise and readily subject to different interpretations.

(J) The form is not more than one page.

(2) The form reads as follows:

IMPORTANT PRIVACY CHOICE

You have the right to control whether we share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners (companies
 that we partner with to offer products or services to our alumni). Please read the following information carefully before you make your choice below:

Your Rights

You have the following rights to restrict the sharing of your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners. This form does not prohibit us from sharing your information when we are required to do so by law. This includes sending you information about the alumni association, the university, or other products or services.

Your Choice

Restrict Information Sharing With Affinity Partners:

Unless you say “NO,” we may share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners. Our affinity partners may send you offers to purchase various products or services that we may have agreed they can offer in partnership with
 us.

( ) NO, please do not share my name, address, and email address with your affinity partners.

Time Sensitive Reply

You may decide at any time that you do not want us to share your information with our affinity partners. Your choice marked here will remain unless you state otherwise. However, if we do not hear from you, we may share your name, address, and email address with our affinity partners.

If you decide that you do not want to receive information from our partners, you may do one of the following:

(1) Call this toll-free telephone number: (xxx-xxx-xxxx).

(2) Reply electronically by contacting us through the following Internet option: xxxxxxxxxxxx.com.

(3) Fill out, sign, and send back this form to us at the following address (you may want to make a copy for your records).

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Xxxxxxxxxxxxxxxxx

Name:

Address:

Signature:

(3) (A) The trustees, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization shall not be in violation of this subdivision solely because they include in the form one or more brief examples or explanations of the purpose or purposes for which, or the context within which, names, addresses, and email addresses will be shared, as long as those examples meet the clarity and readability standards set forth in paragraph (1).

(B) (i) The solicitation to students, upon their graduation, from the trustees or the alumni association, encouraging students to join the alumni association or to avail themselves of the services or benefits of the association, shall include the form.

(ii) The alumni association magazine or newsletter, or both, shall include the form on an annual or more frequent basis.

(iii) The Internet Web site for the alumni association shall include a link to the form, which shall be located on either the homepage of the association’s Internet Web site or in the association’s privacy policy.

(iv) A one-time mailing to all alumni on the university mailing list as of January 1, 2006, shall include the form.

(v) An annual electronic communication to those alumni for whom email addresses are available shall include the form.

(4) The trustees, the affected alumni associations, or the affected auxiliary organizations shall provide at least two alternative cost-free means for alumni to communicate their privacy choices, such as calling a toll-free telephone number or using electronic means. The trustees, the alumni association, or the auxiliary organization shall clearly and conspicuously disclose in the form required by this subdivision the information necessary to direct the alumnus on how to communicate his or her choice, including the toll-free telephone or facsimile number or Internet Web site address that may be used, if those means of communication are offered.

(5) (A) An alumnus may direct at any
 time that his or her name, address, and email address not be disclosed. The trustees, the affected alumni association, or the affected auxiliary organization shall comply with the direction of an alumnus concerning the sharing of his or her name, address, and email address within 45 days of receipt by the trustees, the alumni association, or the auxiliary organization. When an alumnus directs that his or her name, address, and email address not be disclosed, that direction is in effect until otherwise stated by the alumnus.

(B) This subdivision does not prohibit the disclosure of the name, address, and email address of an alumnus as allowed by other applicable state laws.

(6) The trustees, or the affected alumni association or the affected auxiliary organization, may provide a joint notice from the trustees or from one or more alumni associations, as identified in the notice, so
 long as the notice is accurate with respect to the trustees and the alumni association or associations or auxiliary organization or organizations participating in the joint notice.

(d) As used in this section, “auxiliary organization” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 89901.

(e) This section shall not be construed to authorize the release of any social security numbers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 76.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Education Programs [89200. - 89297.1.]



  ARTICLE 1. Noncommercial Television [89200. - 89200.]

89200.

The trustees, on behalf of any campus of the California State University, may enter into contracts for the purpose of participating in, or the procuring or transmitting of, television broadcasts, may purchase broadcast time over, and may own, lease, and operate, television transmitting facilities for use in providing educational, noncommercial television broadcasts, and may provide necessary services in connection therewith.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 113.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Laboratory Classes for Exceptional Children [89210. - 89212.]

89210.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature in providing for the establishment at or in conjunction with individual state universities, under this article, of laboratory classes for exceptional children, to accomplish the following general aims:

(a) Improve programs presently offered within the California State University system for the training of teachers in the education of exceptional children, and afford prospective teachers with direct experience with typical exceptional children.

(b) Provide facilities and workshops where needed systematic continuing research in the development of methods, means, and techniques in teaching of exceptional children shall be conducted.

(c) Accelerate the recruitment and training of prospective teachers of exceptional children and provide in-service training for credentialed teachers to improve their skills.

(d) Provide a combined and comprehensive university level program of research and teacher training to meet the needs of exceptional children which will serve to attract and effectively utilize available public and private funds and grants.

(e) Provide for increased and improved special educational services for exceptional children through cooperation and coordination with local school districts and county offices.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 143, Sec. 114.)
-------------------------------------------

89212.

The trustees are authorized to accept and devote to the financial support of any of the laboratory classes for exceptional children maintained in conjunction with any state university or college, any federal funds and any other public or private funds which may be allotted or granted for such purposes, and shall have the power to take all measures necessary to effect compliance with the terms and conditions under which such an allotment or grant may be made.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Vocational Teachers [89220. - 89223.]

89220.

There is hereby continued in existence a board of examiners for vocational teachers. The board shall consist of the Commission for Vocational Education, as created and established by the State Board of Education and two other members, selected by the trustees who are presidents of state colleges and who shall hold office at the pleasure of the trustees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

89221.
